North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 29. Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Capital Improvements. [Repealed]

§§ 120-258 through 120-260.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-258; 2002-126, s. 29.3; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-259; 2002-126, s. 29.3; 2006-203, s. 63; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-260; 2002-126, s. 29.3; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.2(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§ 120-261.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Capital Improvements.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Capital Improvements is established. The Committee consists of 16 members as follows:

Eight members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least two of whom are members of the minority party.

Eight members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least two of whom are members of the minority party.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year, except the terms of the initial members, which begin on appointment and end on the day of the convening of the 2017 General Assembly. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until the member’s successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

2015-241, s. 31.16(a).

§ 120-262.
Purpose and powers of the Committee.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Capital Improvements shall have the power to do all of the following:

Examine, on a continuing basis, capital improvements requested by, authorized for, and undertaken by or on behalf of State agencies.

Have oversight over implementation of the six-year capital improvements plan developed pursuant to

G.S. 143C-8-5

.

Make recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve the planning, financing, design, construction, and maintenance of State capital improvements.

Make reports and recommendations to the General Assembly regarding which capital improvements requested by State agencies should be authorized and how they should be funded.

Examine any other topic the Committee believes to be related to its purpose.

As used in this section, the term “capital improvement” shall have the same meaning as in

G.S. 143C-1-1

.

History.

2015-241, s. 31.16(a).

§ 120-263.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Capital Improvements. The Committee shall meet upon the call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is nine members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

through

G.S. 120-19

.4.

Members of the Committee receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

The cochairs of the Committee may call upon other knowledgeable persons or experts to assist the Committee in its work.

History.

2015-241, s. 31.16(a).

§ 120-264.
[Reserved.]

Reserved for future codification purposes.